nl: Tafeltennis certificering: Wedstrijdkwaliteit; ITTF-goedgekeurd; Recreatief; Niet-geclassificeerd; Overig
ko: 탁구 인증: 대회용 등급; ITTF 공인; 레크리에이션용; 등급 없음; 기타
zh-TW: 桌球認證: 比賽級; ITTF 認證; 休閒用; 無評級; 其他
ru: Сертификация настольного тенниса: Для соревнований; Одобрено ITTF; Любительский уровень; Без рейтинга; Другое
nb: Bordtennissertifisering: Konkurransekvalitet; ITTF-godkjent; Fritid; Ikke vurdert; Annet
vi: Chứng chỉ bóng bàn: Cấp độ thi đấu; Được ITTF phê duyệt; Giải trí; Không phân hạng; Khác
de: Tischtennis-Zertifizierung: Wettkampfqualität; ITTF-zertifiziert; Freizeit; Ohne Einstufung; Andere
sl-SI: Certifikat za namizni tenis: Tekmovalna raven; Odobreno pri ITTF; Rekreativno; Brez ocene; Drugo
pt-BR: Pingue-pongue certificação: Nível de competição; Aprovado pela ITTF; Recreativo; Sem classificação; Outros
hr-HR: Certifikat za ping pong tenis: Natjecateljska klasa; Odobrio ITTF; Rekreativno; Bez certifikata; Ostalo
it: Certificazione ping pong: Livello da competizione; Approvato ITTF; Ricreativo; Non classificato; Altro
cs: Certifikace ping pongu: Soutěžní úroveň; Schváleno ITTF; Rekreační; Bez hodnocení; Ostatní
lt-LT: Stalo teniso sertifikavimas: Varžybų lygio; Patvirtinta ITTF; Pramoginis; Neįvertintas; Kita
el: Πιστοποίηση πινγκ-πονγκ: Επιπέδου αγώνων; Εγκεκριμένο από την ITTF; Ερασιτεχνικό; Χωρίς αξιολόγηση; Άλλο
fr: Certification de ping-pong: Qualité compétition; Approuvé par l’ITTF; Récréatif; Non évalué; Autre
hu: Asztalitenisz-minősítés: Verseny kategóriájú; ITTF által jóváhagyott; Szabadidős; Besorolatlan; Egyéb
pl: Certyfikacja ping-ponga: Klasa turniejowa; Zatwierdzone przez ITTF; Rekreacyjna; Bez oceny; Inna
th: ใบรับรองปิงปอง: เกรดแข่งขัน; ได้รับการรับรองจาก ITTF; สันทนาการ; ไม่ได้จัดระดับ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Certificare Ping -pong: Calitate de competiție; Aprobat de ITTF; Recreativ; Neevaluat; Altele
sk-SK: Certifikácia stolného tenisu: Súťažná úroveň; Schválené ITTF; Rekreačné; Bez hodnotenia; Iné
zh-CN: 乒乓球认证等级: 比赛级; ITTF 认证; 休闲级; 未评级; 其他
sv: Bordtenniscerifiering: Tävlingskvalitet; ITTF-godkänd; Fritid; Ej klassificerad; Övrigt
fi: Pöytätennissertifikaatti: Kilpailutaso; ITTF-hyväksytty; Harrastetaso; Luokittelematon; Muu
es: Certificación de ping pong: Grado de competición; Aprobada por la ITTF; Recreativa; Sin clasificación; Otra
bg-BG: Сертификация за пинг-понг: Състезателен клас; Одобрено от ITTF; За любители; Без категория; Друго
tr: Masa tenisi sertifikası: Müsabaka sınıfı; ITTF onaylı; Eğlence amaçlı; Derecelendirilmemiş; Diğer
ja: 卓球認定: 競技用; ITTF公認; レクリエーション用; レーティングなし; その他
pt-PT: certificação de ténis de Ping: Nível de competição; Aprovado pela ITTF; Recreativo; Sem classificação; Outra
en: Ping pong certification: Competition grade; ITTF approved; Recreational; Unrated; Other
da: Bordtenniscertificering: Konkurrencegodkendt; Godkendt af ITTF; Fritid; Ikke klassificeret; Andet